Connecticut, session 2026, HB05378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 38a-1 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
3 Terms used in this title and sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless it
4 appears from the context to the contrary, shall have a scope and
5 meaning as set forth in this section.
6 (1) "Affiliate" or "affiliated" means a person that directly, or indirectly
7 through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is
8 under common control with another person.
9 (2) "Alien insurer" means any insurer that has been chartered by or
10 organized or constituted within or under the laws of any jurisdiction or
11 country without the United States.
12 (3) "Annuities" means all agreements to make periodical payments
13 where the making or continuance of all or some of the series of the
14 payments, or the amount of the payment, is dependent upon the
15 continuance of human life or is for a specified term of years. This
LCO 1 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
16 definition does not apply to payments made under a policy of life
17 insurance.
18 (4) "Commissioner" means the Insurance Commissioner.
19 (5) "Control", "controlled by" or "under common control with" means
20 the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the
21 direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through
22 the ownership of voting securities, by contract other than a commercial
23 contract for goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the
24 power is the result of an official position with the person.
25 (6) "Domestic insurer" means any insurer that has been chartered by,
26 incorporated, organized or constituted within or under the laws of this
27 state.
28 (7) "Domestic surplus lines insurer" means any domestic insurer that
29 has been authorized by the commissioner to write surplus lines
30 insurance.
31 (8) "Foreign country" means any jurisdiction not in any state, district
32 or territory of the United States.
33 (9) "Foreign insurer" means any insurer that has been chartered by or
34 organized or constituted within or under the laws of another state or a
35 territory of the United States.
36 (10) "Insolvency" or "insolvent" means, for any insurer, that it is
37 unable to pay its obligations when they are due, or when its admitted
38 assets do not exceed its liabilities plus the greater of: (A) Capital and
39 surplus required by law for its organization and continued operation;
40 or (B) the total par or stated value of its authorized and issued capital
41 stock. For purposes of this subdivision "liabilities" shall include but not
42 be limited to reserves required by statute or by regulations adopted by
43 the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 or
44 specific requirements imposed by the commissioner upon a subject
45 company at the time of admission or subsequent thereto.
LCO 2 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
46 (11) "Insurance" means any agreement to pay a sum of money,
47 provide services or any other thing of value on the happening of a
48 particular event or contingency or to provide indemnity for loss in
49 respect to a specified subject by specified perils in return for a
50 consideration. In any contract of insurance, an insured shall have an
51 interest which is subject to a risk of loss through destruction or
52 impairment of that interest, which risk is assumed by the insurer and
53 such assumption shall be part of a general scheme to distribute losses
54 among a large group of persons bearing similar risks in return for a
55 ratable contribution or other consideration.
56 (12) "Insurer" or "insurance company" includes any person or
57 combination of persons doing any kind or form of insurance business
58 other than a fraternal benefit society, and shall include a receiver of any
59 insurer when the context reasonably permits.
60 (13) "Insured" means a person to whom or for whose benefit an
61 insurer makes a promise in an insurance policy. The term includes
62 policyholders, subscribers, members and beneficiaries. This definition
63 applies only to the provisions of this title and does not define the
64 meaning of this word as used in insurance policies or certificates.
65 (14) "Life insurance" means insurance on human lives and insurances
66 pertaining to or connected with human life. The business of life
67 insurance includes granting endowment benefits, granting additional
68 benefits in the event of death by accident or accidental means, granting
69 additional benefits in the event of the total and permanent disability of
70 the insured, and providing optional methods of settlement of proceeds.
71 Life insurance includes burial contracts to the extent provided by
72 section 38a-464.
73 (15) "Mutual insurer" means any insurer without capital stock, the
74 managing directors or officers of which are elected by its members.
75 (16) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a
76 limited liability company, an association, a joint stock company, a
77 business trust, an unincorporated organization or other legal entity.
LCO 3 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
78 (17) "Policy" means any document, including attached endorsements
79 and riders, purporting to be an enforceable contract, which
80 memorializes in writing some or all of the terms of an insurance
81 contract.
82 (18) "State" means any state, district, or territory of the United States.
83 (19) "Subsidiary" of a specified person means an affiliate controlled
84 by the person directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries.
85 (20) "Unauthorized insurer" or "nonadmitted insurer" means an
86 insurer that has not been granted a certificate of authority by the
87 commissioner to transact the business of insurance in this state or an
88 insurer transacting business not authorized by a valid certificate.
89 (21) "United States" means the United States of America, its territories
90 and possessions, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the District of
91 Columbia.
92 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) For the purposes of this
93 section and section 3 of this act:
94 (1) "Actuarial value" means a level of coverage provided by a health
95 plan design that is offered as a percentage of the full value of the benefits
96 provided under such plan;
97 (2) "Commercial domicile" means the headquarters of a trade or
98 business that is the place from which such trade or business is
99 principally managed and directed;
100 (3) "Employer member" means an entity domiciled in this state or that
101 maintains such entity's commercial domicile in this state, is a member
102 of a sponsoring association and employs more than one individual in
103 this state. "Employer member" may include such employer member's
104 sponsoring association that is domiciled in this state and employs more
105 than one individual in this state;
106 (4) "ERISA" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
LCO 4 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
107 1974, as amended from time to time;
108 (5) "Health benefit plan" means a contract, certificate or agreement
109 offered, delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, amended or continued
110 in this state by a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
111 trust to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of the
112 costs of the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a health
113 condition, illness, injury or disease. "Health benefit plan" does not
114 include insurance products;
115 (6) "Health enhancement program" has the same meaning as
116 provided in section 38a- 477ll of the general statutes;
117 (7) "Participating employee" means any employee of a participating
118 employer who enrolls in a health benefit plan offered by a self-funded
119 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust;
120 (8) "Participating employer" means any employer member that
121 participates in a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement;
122 (9) "Preexisting conditions provision" has the same meaning as
123 provided in section 38a-476 of the general statutes;
124 (10) "Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement" means a
125 program established or maintained on behalf of employer members and
126 offered by a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
127 for the purpose of providing one or more health benefit plans for such
128 employer member's employees and such employees' dependents;
129 (11) "Self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust"
130 means any trust established by a sponsoring association in accordance
131 with subsection (e) of section 3 of this act;
132 (12) "Sponsoring association" means any industry trade group or any
133 other trade group with employer members representing multiple trades
134 domiciled in this state that (A) is organized and has a written
135 constitution or bylaws, (B) has not less than five hundred employees of
136 not less than twenty-five employer members, and (C) has been
LCO 5 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
137 maintained in good faith for not less than the immediately preceding
138 five years for purposes other than obtaining or providing insurance; and
139 (13) "Value-based health benefit plan design" means any material
140 term in a health benefit plan that is designed to increase the quality of
141 covered benefits or health care services while reducing the cost of such
142 health benefit plan or health care services.
143 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) No person, other than a
144 self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, shall
145 establish or operate a self-funded multiple employer welfare
146 arrangement in this state.
147 (b) Any self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust,
148 prior to establishing a self-funded multiple employer welfare
149 arrangement in this state, shall apply for and obtain a license from the
150 commissioner. The commissioner shall issue a license to such self-
151 funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, provided such
152 trust satisfies all licensing requirements applicable to a health insurance
153 company pursuant to chapter 698 of the general statutes. Upon the
154 issuance of a license by the commissioner to a self-funded multiple
155 employer welfare arrangement trust, in accordance with the provisions
156 of this subsection, such trust shall comply with all requirements
157 applicable to health insurance companies set forth in title 38a of the
158 general statutes and any regulations adopted by the commissioner in
159 accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes.
160 (c) (1) The commissioner shall not issue a license to a self-funded
161 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust pursuant to subsection (b)
162 of this section, unless such trust has an initial combined capital and
163 surplus of (A) not less than four million dollars, or (B) an amount
164 determined by the commissioner under the provisions of regulations
165 adopted pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.
166 (2) Beginning on April 1, 2027, any self-funded multiple employer
167 welfare arrangement trust that meets the licensing requirements
168 pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may offer a health benefit plan
LCO 6 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
169 to participating employees of one or more participating employers.
170 (d) Any health benefit plan issued by a self-funded multiple
171 employer welfare arrangement trust that covers participating
172 employees of one or more participating employers shall:
173 (1) Provide coverage for essential health benefits as defined in the
174 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended
175 from time to time, or regulations adopted thereunder;
176 (2) Offer to each participating employer health benefit plans with a
177 minimum level of coverage designed to provide health benefits that are
178 actuarially equivalent, respectively, to not less than sixty per cent, not
179 less than sixty-eight per cent and not less than seventy-eight per cent of
180 the full actuarial value of the benefits provided under each health
181 benefit plan;
182 (3) Not limit or exclude coverage for any individual by imposing a
183 preexisting conditions provision on such individual;
184 (4) Not establish discriminatory rules based on the health status of an
185 individual related to health benefit plan eligibility, or rate or
186 contribution requirements;
187 (5) Establish base rates formed on an actuarially sound, modified
188 community rating methodology that considers the pooling of all
189 participating employees' claims;
190 (6) Utilize each participating employer's risk profile to determine
191 rates by actuarially adjusting above or below established base rates, and
192 utilize pooling or reinsurance of individual large claims to reduce the
193 adverse impact on any specific participating employer's rates. The self-
194 funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust shall establish the
195 applicable pooling point, which shall consistently apply to all such
196 participating employers;
197 (7) Utilize actuarially sound underwriting methodologies for pricing
198 and renewing health benefit plans for participating employers;
LCO 7 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
199 (8) Adopt and maintain underwriting guidelines for evaluating
200 applicants and accepting such applicants as new participating
201 employers;
202 (9) Adopt and maintain renewal methodologies, which may be
203 reviewed by the commissioner;
204 (10) Use surplus in excess of an amount to be determined by the
205 commissioner on an annual basis to reduce health benefit plan
206 contribution amounts paid by participating employers and
207 participating employees;
208 (11) Make any health benefit plan available to all participating
209 employers regardless of any factor relating to the health status of such
210 participating employer or individuals eligible for coverage through any
211 participating employer; and
212 (12) With regard to participating employees, comply with the
213 notification requirements set forth in sections 38a-591c to 38a-591g,
214 inclusive, of the general statutes with respect to utilization review and
215 benefit determinations of a benefit request or claim.
216 (e) A sponsoring association shall form a self-funded multiple
217 employer welfare arrangement trust that shall establish, maintain and
218 offer health benefit plans for the self-funded multiple employer welfare
219 arrangement. Such trust shall be authorized to sell health benefit plans
220 to participating employers exclusively through insurance producers
221 licensed in accordance with chapter 702 of the general statutes, provided
222 such trust meets the following conditions:
223 (1) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
224 shall be subject to ERISA and any regulations or standards prescribed
225 by the United States Department of Labor pertaining to multiple
226 employer welfare arrangements;
227 (2) A Form M-1 shall be filed each year by such trust with the United
228 States Department of Labor. For purposes of this subdivision, "Form M-
LCO 8 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
229 1" means an annual report required by the United States Department of
230 Labor for multiple employer welfare arrangements that includes, but is
231 not limited to, the following: (A) Identification of the sponsoring
232 association and the self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
233 trust; and (B) a description of the health benefit plans offered through
234 such self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust;
235 (3) Any organizational documents for a self-funded multiple
236 employer welfare arrangement trust shall:
237 (A) State that such self-funded multiple employer welfare
238 arrangement trust is sponsored by the sponsoring association;
239 (B) State that the purpose of such self-funded multiple employer
240 welfare arrangement trust is to provide health benefit plans to eligible
241 employers;
242 (C) Provide that self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
243 trust funds shall be used for the benefit of eligible employers through (i)
244 self-funding of claims or the purchase of reinsurance, or any
245 combination thereof, and (ii) defraying the costs and expenses of
246 administering and operating such self-funded multiple employer
247 welfare arrangement trust and any health benefit plan issued by such
248 trust;
249 (D) Limit participation in any health benefit plan to eligible
250 employers;
251 (E) Establish and maintain a board of trustees, composed of not less
252 than five trustees, that shall have fiscal control over such self-funded
253 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust for the purpose of
254 managing all health benefit plans established, maintained and offered
255 by such self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust. Any
256 board of trustees shall have the authority to contract with any licensed
257 administrator or service company to administer the daily operations of
258 the health benefit plans;
LCO 9 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
259 (F) Implement a process for the election of trustees to the board of
260 trustees; and
261 (G) Require each trustee to discharge such trustee's duties in
262 accordance with generally accepted fiduciary standards;
263 (4) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
264 shall establish and maintain reserves in accordance with any financial
265 and solvency requirements applicable to health insurance companies set
266 forth in title 38a of the general statutes and any regulations adopted by
267 the commissioner in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
268 general statutes;
269 (5) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
270 shall purchase and maintain an insurance policy providing coverage for
271 stop-loss insurance for each health benefit plan with retention levels
272 determined in accordance with actuarial principles from insurers
273 licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state;
274 (6) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
275 shall purchase and maintain an aggregate stop-loss insurance policy
276 with an attachment point equal to one hundred twenty-five per cent of
277 losses. The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
278 may submit a written request to the commissioner to modify the
279 aggregate stop-loss policy. Not later than thirty calendar days after the
280 commissioner receives such request, the commissioner shall issue a
281 decision granting or denying such request;
282 (7) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
283 shall purchase and maintain commercially reasonable fiduciary liability
284 insurance from insurers licensed to transact the business of insurance in
285 this state;
286 (8) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
287 shall purchase and maintain commercially reasonable directors' and
288 officers' liability insurance from insurers licensed to transact the
289 business of insurance in this state;
LCO 10 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
290 (9) The self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
291 shall purchase and maintain a bond in an amount and form approved
292 by the commissioner; and
293 (10) No self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust
294 shall include in its name the words "insurance", "insurer", "underwriter",
295 "mutual" or any other word or term or combination of words or terms
296 that are descriptive of an insurance company or insurance business,
297 unless the context of such words or terms indicates that such self-funded
298 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust is not an insurance
299 company and is not transacting the business of insurance.
300 (f) Any board of trustees established pursuant to subsection (e) of this
301 section shall:
302 (1) Operate any health benefit plan in accordance with the fiduciary
303 standards set forth in the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, P.L.
304 116-260, as amended from time to time, and all other generally accepted
305 fiduciary standards; and
306 (2) Pay all costs assessed by the commissioner in accordance with title
307 38a of the general statutes. Such board of trustees shall have the
308 authority to collect fees on a pro rata basis from the participating
309 employers. No self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
310 trust shall be subject to (A) the health and welfare fee required under
311 section 19a-7j of the general statutes, (B) the public health fee required
312 under section 19a-7p of the general statutes, (C) any payment required
313 under section 38a-48 of the general statutes, or (D) the premium tax
314 required under section 12-202 of the general statutes.
315 (g) Each participating employer shall be (1) liable for such
316 participating employer's allocated share of the liabilities arising under a
317 health benefit plan provided by the self-funded multiple employer
318 welfare arrangement trust, as determined by the board of trustees, and
319 (2) jointly and severally liable for additional amounts if the annual
320 health benefit plan subscription amounts paid by all participating
321 employers of such plan result in a deficit of funds for the self-funded
LCO 11 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
322 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust. Each participating
323 employer's liability under this subsection shall not be assessed to
324 participating employees of such participating employer.
325 (h) Health benefit plan documents issued by any self-funded multiple
326 employer welfare arrangement trust to participating employers shall
327 have the following statement printed on the first page in fourteen-point
328 boldface type: "This health benefit plan is provided by a trust
329 established to provide health benefit plans to employees of employers
330 participating in a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement.
331 This health benefit plan is not insurance and is not offered through an
332 insurance company. This health benefit plan is not required to comply
333 with certain federal market requirements for health insurance, and is
334 not required to comply with certain state laws for health insurance. Each
335 participating employer shall be liable for such participating employer's
336 allocated share of the liabilities of the trust under all health benefit plans
337 offered by the trust, as determined by the board of trustees. Each
338 participating employer shall be jointly and severally liable for additional
339 amounts if the annual health benefit plan subscription amounts paid by
340 all participating employers and participating employees of such
341 participating employer result in a deficit of funds for the trust and for
342 any assessments by state regulators. The trust's financial statements
343 shall be made available upon request by any participating employer in
344 the self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement.".
345 (i) Health benefit plan documents issued by any self-funded multiple
346 employer welfare arrangement trust to participating employees shall
347 have the following statement printed on the first page in fourteen-point
348 boldface type: "This health benefit plan is provided by a trust
349 established to provide health benefit plans to employees of employers
350 participating in a self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement,
351 including your employer. This health benefit plan is not insurance and
352 is not offered through an insurance company. This health benefit plan is
353 not required to comply with certain federal market requirements for
354 health insurance, and is not required to comply with certain state laws
355 for health insurance. Your employer shall be liable for such employer's
LCO 12 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
356 allocated share of the liabilities of the trust under all health benefit plans
357 offered by the trust, as determined by the board of trustees. Your
358 employer shall be jointly and severally liable for additional amounts if
359 the annual health benefit plan subscription amounts paid by all
360 participating employers and participating employees of such
361 participating employer result in a deficit of funds for the trust and for
362 any assessments by state regulators. The trust's financial statements
363 shall be made available to you upon request. The Consumer Affairs
364 Division within the Insurance Department is available to assist you with
365 questions that you may have concerning this health benefit plan.". The
366 notice shall include the telephone number and electronic mail address
367 for the Consumer Affairs Division.
368 (j) No self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust shall
369 be subject to the Connecticut Insurance Guaranty Association
370 established pursuant to sections 38a-836 to 38a-853, inclusive, of the
371 general statutes.
372 (k) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
373 provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
374 provisions of this section.
375 Sec. 4. Section 38a-567 of the general statutes is repealed and the
376 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
377 Health insurance plans, associations of small employers and other
378 insurance arrangements covering small employers and insurers and
379 producers marketing such plans and arrangements shall be subject to
380 the following provisions:
381 (1) (A) Any such plan or arrangement shall be offered on a
382 guaranteed issue basis with respect to all eligible employees or
383 dependents of such employees, at the option of the small employer,
384 policyholder or contractholder, as the case may be.
385 (B) Any such plan or arrangement shall be renewable with respect to
386 all eligible employees or dependents at the option of the small employer,
LCO 13 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
387 policyholder or contractholder, as the case may be, except: (i) For
388 nonpayment of the required premiums by the small employer,
389 policyholder or contractholder; (ii) for fraud or misrepresentation of the
390 small employer, policyholder or contractholder or, with respect to
391 coverage of individual insured, the insureds or their representatives;
392 (iii) for noncompliance with plan or arrangement provisions; (iv) when
393 the number of insureds covered under the plan or arrangement is less
394 than the number of insureds or percentage of insureds required by
395 participation requirements under the plan or arrangement; or (v) when
396 the small employer, policyholder or contractholder is no longer actively
397 engaged in the business in which it was engaged on the effective date of
398 the plan or arrangement.
399 (C) Renewability of coverage may be effected by either continuing in
400 effect a plan or arrangement covering a small employer or by
401 substituting upon renewal for the prior plan or arrangement the plan or
402 arrangement then offered by the carrier that most closely corresponds
403 to the prior plan or arrangement and is available to other small
404 employers. Such substitution shall only be made under conditions
405 approved by the commissioner. A carrier may substitute a plan or
406 arrangement as set forth in this subparagraph only if the carrier effects
407 the same substitution upon renewal for all small employers previously
408 covered under the particular plan or arrangement, unless otherwise
409 approved by the commissioner. The substitute plan or arrangement
410 shall be subject to the rating restrictions specified in this section on the
411 same basis as if no substitution had occurred, except for an adjustment
412 based on coverage differences.
413 (D) Any such plan or arrangement shall provide special enrollment
414 periods (i) to all eligible employees or dependents as set forth in 45 CFR
415 147.104, as amended from time to time, and (ii) for coverage under such
416 plan or arrangement ordered by a court for a spouse or minor child of
417 an eligible employee where request for enrollment is made not later than
418 thirty days after the issuance of such court order.
419 (2) (A) As used in this subdivision, "grandfathered plan" has the same
LCO 14 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
420 meaning as "grandfathered health plan" as provided in the Patient
421 Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended from time
422 to time.
423 (B) With respect to grandfathered plans issued to small employers,
424 except as a member of an association of small employers, the premium
425 rates charged or offered shall be established on the basis of a single pool
426 of all grandfathered plans, adjusted to reflect one or more of the
427 following classifications:
428 (i) Age, provided age brackets of less than five years shall not be
429 utilized;
430 (ii) Gender;
431 (iii) Geographic area, provided an area smaller than a county shall
432 not be utilized;
433 (iv) Industry, provided the rate factor associated with any industry
434 classification shall not vary from the arithmetic average of the highest
435 and lowest rate factors associated with all industry classifications by
436 greater than fifteen per cent of such average, and provided further, the
437 rate factors associated with any industry shall not be increased by more
438 than five per cent per year;
439 (v) Group size, provided the highest rate factor associated with group
440 size shall not vary from the lowest rate factor associated with group size
441 by a ratio of greater than 1.25 to 1.0;
442 (vi) Administrative cost savings resulting from the administration of
443 an association group plan or a plan written pursuant to section 5-259,
444 provided the savings reflect a reduction to the small employer carrier's
445 overall retention that is measurable and specifically realized on items
446 such as marketing, billing or claims paying functions taken on directly
447 by the plan administrator or association, except that such savings may
448 not reflect a reduction realized on commissions;
449 (vii) Savings resulting from a reduction in the profit of a carrier that
LCO 15 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
450 writes small business plans or arrangements for an association group
451 plan or a plan written pursuant to section 5-259, provided any loss in
452 overall revenue due to a reduction in profit is not shifted to other small
453 employers; and
454 (viii) Family composition, provided the small employer carrier shall
455 utilize only one or more of the following billing classifications: (I)
456 Employee; (II) employee plus family; (III) employee and spouse; (IV)
457 employee and child; (V) employee plus one dependent; and (VI)
458 employee plus two or more dependents.
459 (C) (i) With respect to nongrandfathered plans issued to small
460 employers, except as a member of an association of small employers, the
461 premium rates charged or offered shall be established on the basis of a
462 single pool of all nongrandfathered plans, adjusted to reflect one or
463 more of the following classifications:
464 (I) Age, in accordance with a uniform age rating curve established by
465 the commissioner; or
466 (II) Geographic area, as defined by the commissioner.
467 (ii) Total premium rates for family coverage for nongrandfathered
468 plans shall be determined by adding the premiums for each individual
469 family member, except that with respect to family members under
470 twenty-one years of age, the premiums for only the three oldest covered
471 children shall be taken into account in determining the total premium
472 rate for such family.
473 (iii) Premium rates for employees and dependents for
474 nongrandfathered plans shall be calculated for each covered individual
475 and premium rates for the small employer group shall be calculated by
476 totaling the premiums attributable to each covered individual.
477 (iv) Premium rates for any given plan may vary by (I) actuarially
478 justified differences in plan design, and (II) actuarially justified amounts
479 to reflect the policy's provider network and administrative expense
LCO 16 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
480 differences that can be reasonably allocated to such policy.
481 (3) No small employer carrier or producer shall, directly or indirectly,
482 engage in the following activities:
483 (A) Encouraging or directing small employers to refrain from filing
484 an application for coverage with the small employer carrier because of
485 the health status, claims experience, industry, occupation or geographic
486 location of the small employer, except the provisions of this
487 subparagraph shall not apply to information provided by a small
488 employer carrier or producer to a small employer regarding the carrier's
489 established geographic service area or a restricted network provision of
490 a small employer carrier; or
491 (B) Encouraging or directing small employers to seek coverage from
492 another carrier because of the health status, claims experience, industry,
493 occupation or geographic location of the small employer.
494 (4) No small employer carrier shall, directly or indirectly, enter into
495 any contract, agreement or arrangement with a producer that provides
496 for or results in the compensation paid to a producer for the sale of a
497 health benefit plan to be varied because of the health status, claims
498 experience, industry, occupation or geographic area of the small
499 employer. A small employer carrier shall provide reasonable
500 compensation, as provided under the plan of operation of the program,
501 to a producer, if any, for the sale of a health care plan. No small
502 employer carrier shall terminate, fail to renew or limit its contract or
503 agreement of representation with a producer for any reason related to
504 the health status, claims experience, occupation, or geographic location
505 of the small employers placed by the producer with the small employer
506 carrier.
507 (5) No small employer carrier or producer shall induce or otherwise
508 encourage a small employer to separate or otherwise exclude an
509 employee from health coverage or benefits provided in connection with
510 the employee's employment.
LCO 17 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
511 (6) No small employer carrier or producer shall disclose (A) to a small
512 employer the fact that any or all of the eligible employees of such small
513 employer have been or will be reinsured with the pool, or (B) to any
514 eligible employee or dependent the fact that he has been or will be
515 reinsured with the pool.
516 (7) If a small employer carrier enters into a contract, agreement or
517 other arrangement with another party to provide administrative,
518 marketing or other services related to the offering of health benefit plans
519 to small employers in this state, the other party shall be subject to the
520 provisions of this section.
521 (8) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
522 provisions of chapter 54, setting forth additional standards to provide
523 for the fair marketing and broad availability of health benefit plans to
524 small employers.
525 (9) Any violation of subdivisions (3) to (7), inclusive, of this section
526 and of any regulations established under subdivision (8) of this section
527 shall be an unfair and prohibited practice under sections 38a-815 to 38a-
528 830, inclusive.
529 Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 38a-9 of the 2026 supplement to the
530 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
531 thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
532 (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4-8, there shall be a
533 Division of Consumer Affairs within the Insurance Department, which
534 division shall act on the Insurance Commissioner's behalf and at his
535 direction in order to carry out his responsibilities under this title with
536 respect to such matters. The division shall receive and review
537 complaints from residents of this state concerning their insurance
538 problems and problems arising out of health benefit plans, as defined in
539 section 2 of this act, including claims disputes, and serve as a mediator
540 in such disputes in order to assist the commissioner in determining
541 whether statutory requirements and contractual obligations within the
542 commissioner's jurisdiction have been fulfilled. There shall be a director
LCO 18 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
543 of said division, who shall be provided with sufficient staff. The division
544 shall serve to coordinate all appropriate facilities in the department in
545 addressing such complaints, and conduct any outreach programs
546 deemed necessary to properly inform and educate the public on
547 insurance matters. The director shall submit quarterly reports to the
548 commissioner, which shall state the number of complaints received by
549 the division in such calendar quarter, the Connecticut premium or
550 premium equivalent volume of the appropriate line of each insurance
551 company or self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust,
552 as defined in section 2 of this act, against which a complaint has been
553 filed, the types of complaints received, and the number of such
554 complaints which have been resolved. Such reports shall be published
555 every six months and copies shall be made available to any interested
556 resident of this state upon request. The commissioner shall report, in
557 accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the
558 General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance
559 on or before January fifteenth annually, concerning the findings of such
560 reports and suggestions for legislative initiatives to address recurring
561 problems.
562 Sec. 6. Section 38a-14 of the general statutes is repealed and the
563 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
564 (a) For the purposes of this section, "company" means any insurance
565 company, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, as
566 defined in section 2 of this act, or health care center doing business in
567 this state, any corporation or association collecting data utilized by any
568 such insurance company in the underwriting of insurance policies and
569 any corporation organized under any law of this state or having an
570 office in this state, which corporation is engaged in, or claiming or
571 advertising that it is engaged in, organizing or receiving subscriptions
572 for or disposing of stock of, or in any manner aiding or taking part in
573 the formation or business of, an insurance company or companies, or
574 that is holding the capital stock of one or more insurance corporations
575 for the purpose of controlling the management thereof, as voting
576 trustees or otherwise.
LCO 19 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
577 (b) The commissioner shall, as often as the commissioner deems it
578 expedient, examine into the affairs of any company. In scheduling and
579 determining the nature, scope and frequency of the examinations, the
580 commissioner shall consider such matters as the results of financial
581 statement analyses and ratios, changes in management or ownership,
582 actuarial opinions, reports of independent certified public accountants
583 and such other criteria as set forth in the examiners' handbook adopted
584 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and in effect
585 at the time the commissioner exercises discretion under this section.
586 (c) (1) To carry out examinations under this section, the commissioner
587 may appoint one or more competent persons as examiners, who shall
588 not be officers of, connected with or interested in any company, other
589 than as policyholders. The commissioner may engage the services of
590 attorneys, appraisers, independent actuaries, independent certified
591 public accountants or other professionals and specialists as examiners
592 to assist the commissioner in conducting the examinations under this
593 section, the cost of which shall be borne by the company that is the
594 subject of the examination.
595 (2) In conducting the examination, the commissioner, the
596 commissioner's actuary or any examiner authorized by the
597 commissioner may examine, under oath, the officers and agents of such
598 a company, and all persons deemed to have material information
599 regarding the company's property or business. Each such company or
600 its officers and agents shall produce the books and papers in its or their
601 possession, relating to its business or affairs, and any other person may
602 be required to produce any book or paper in such person's custody that
603 is deemed to be relevant to such examination, for inspection by the
604 commissioner, the commissioner's actuary or examiners. The officers
605 and agents of the company shall facilitate the examination and aid the
606 examiners in making the same so far as it is in their power to do so. The
607 refusal of any company, by its officers, directors, employees or agents,
608 to submit to examination or to comply with any reasonable written
609 request of the examiners shall be grounds for suspension of, refusal of
610 or nonrenewal of any license or authority held by the company to
LCO 20 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
611 engage in an insurance or other business subject to the commissioner's
612 jurisdiction. Any such proceedings for suspension, revocation or refusal
613 of any license or authority shall be conducted pursuant to subsection (c)
614 of section 38a-41.
615 (3) In conducting the examination, the examiner shall observe those
616 guidelines and procedures set forth in the examiners' handbook
617 adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The
618 commissioner may also adopt such other guidelines or procedures as
619 the commissioner may deem appropriate.
620 (d) In lieu of an examination under this section of any foreign or alien
621 insurer licensed in this state, the commissioner may accept an
622 examination report on such insurer prepared by the insurance
623 department for the insurer's state of domicile or port-of-entry state if (1)
624 such state's insurance department was, at the time of the examination,
625 accredited under the National Association of Insurance Commissioners'
626 financial regulation standards and accreditation program, or (2) the
627 examination is performed under the supervision of an accredited
628 insurance department or with the participation of one or more
629 examiners who are employed by such an accredited state insurance
630 department and who, after a review of the examination workpapers and
631 report, state under oath that the examination was performed in a
632 manner consistent with the standards and procedures required by their
633 insurance department.
634 (e) (1) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the
635 commissioner's authority to terminate or suspend any examination in
636 order to pursue legal or regulatory action pursuant to the insurance
637 laws of this state. Findings of fact and conclusions made pursuant to any
638 examination shall be prima facie evidence in any legal or regulatory
639 action.
640 (2) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit the
641 commissioner's authority in such legal or regulatory action to use and,
642 if appropriate, to make public any final or preliminary examination
LCO 21 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
643 report, any examiner or company workpapers or other documents, or
644 any other information discovered or developed during the course of any
645 examination.
646 (3) Not later than sixty days following completion of the examination,
647 the examiner in charge shall file, under oath, with the Insurance
648 Department a verified written report of examination. Upon receipt of
649 the verified report, the Insurance Department shall transmit the report
650 to the company examined, together with a notice that shall afford the
651 company examined a reasonable opportunity, not to exceed thirty days,
652 to make a written submission or rebuttal with respect to any matters
653 contained in the examination report. Not later than thirty days after the
654 period allowed for the receipt of written submissions or rebuttals, the
655 commissioner shall fully consider and review the report, together with
656 any written submissions or rebuttals and any relevant portions of the
657 examiner's workpapers and enter an order: (A) Adopting the
658 examination report as filed or with modification or corrections. If the
659 examination report reveals that the company is operating in violation of
660 any law, regulation or prior order of the commissioner, the
661 commissioner may order the company to take any action the
662 commissioner considers necessary and appropriate to cure such
663 violation; (B) rejecting the examination report with directions to the
664 examiners to reopen the examination for purposes of obtaining
665 additional data, documentation or information, and refiling pursuant to
666 this subdivision; or (C) calling for an investigatory hearing with not less
667 than twenty days' notice to the company for purposes of obtaining
668 additional documentation, data, information and testimony.
669 (4) (A) The commissioner shall transmit the examination report
670 adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of this
671 subsection or a summary thereof to the company examined, together
672 with any recommendations or written statements from the
673 commissioner or the examiner. The secretary of the board of directors or
674 similar governing body of the company shall provide a copy of the
675 report or summary to each director and shall certify to the
676 commissioner, in writing, that a copy of the report or summary has been
LCO 22 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
677 provided to each director.
678 (B) Not later than one hundred twenty days after receiving the report
679 or summary, the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of
680 the company examined shall present the report or summary to the
681 company's board of directors or similar governing body at a regular or
682 special meeting.
683 (f) (1) All orders entered pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (e)
684 of this section shall be accompanied by findings and conclusions
685 resulting from the commissioner's consideration and review of the
686 examination report, relevant examiner workpapers and any written
687 submissions or rebuttals. The findings and conclusions that form the
688 basis of any such order of the commissioner shall be subject to review as
689 provided in section 38a-19.
690 (2) Any investigatory hearing conducted under subparagraph (C) of
691 subdivision (3) of subsection (e) of this section by the commissioner or
692 the commissioner's authorized representative, shall be conducted as a
693 nonadversarial confidential investigatory proceeding as necessary for
694 the resolution of any inconsistencies, discrepancies or disputed issues
695 apparent (A) upon the filed examination report, (B) raised by or as a
696 result of the commissioner's review of relevant workpapers, or (C) by
697 the written submission or rebuttal of the company. Not later than
698 twenty days after the conclusion of any such hearing, the commissioner
699 shall enter an order pursuant to subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of
700 subsection (e) of this section. The commissioner shall not appoint an
701 examiner as an authorized representative to conduct the hearing. The
702 hearing shall proceed expeditiously with discovery by the company
703 limited to the examiner's workpapers that tend to substantiate any
704 assertions set forth in any written submission or rebuttal. The
705 commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative may
706 issue subpoenas for the attendance of any witnesses or the production
707 of any documents deemed relevant to the investigation, whether under
708 the control of the department, the company or other persons. The
709 documents produced shall be included in the record and testimony
LCO 23 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
710 taken by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized
711 representative shall be under oath and preserved for the record.
712 Nothing contained in this section shall require the department to
713 disclose any information or records that would indicate or show the
714 existence or content of any investigation or activity of a criminal justice
715 agency. The hearing shall proceed with the commissioner or the
716 commissioner's authorized representative posing questions to the
717 persons subpoenaed. Thereafter, the company and the Insurance
718 Department may present testimony relevant to the investigation. Cross-
719 examination shall be conducted only by the commissioner or the
720 commissioner's authorized representative. The company and the
721 Insurance Department shall be permitted to make closing statements
722 and may be represented by counsel of their choice.
723 (g) The commissioner may, if the commissioner deems it in the public
724 interest, publish any such report, or the result of any such examination
725 contained therein, in one or more newspapers of the state.
726 (h) The commissioner shall, at least once in every five years, visit and
727 examine the affairs of each domestic insurer, domestic health care
728 center, domestic fraternal benefit society, self-funded multiple
729 employer welfare arrangement trust, as defined in section 2 of this act,
730 and foreign and alien insurer doing business in this state.
731 Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section, no
732 domestic insurer or such other domestic entity subject to examination
733 under this section shall pay as costs associated with the examination the
734 salaries, fringe benefits or travel and maintenance expenses of
735 examining personnel of the Insurance Department engaged in such
736 examination if such domestic insurer or domestic entity is otherwise
737 liable to assessment levied under section 38a-47, except that a domestic
738 insurer or such other domestic entity shall pay the travel and
739 maintenance expenses of examining personnel of the Insurance
740 Department when such insurer or entity is examined outside the state.
741 (i) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent or be construed as
742 prohibiting the commissioner from disclosing the content of an
LCO 24 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
743 examination report, preliminary examination report or results, or any
744 matter relating thereto, to the Insurance Department of this or any other
745 state or country, or to law enforcement officials of this or any other state
746 or to any agency of the federal government at any time, so long as such
747 agency or office receiving the report or matters relating thereto agrees,
748 in writing, to hold such report and matters relating thereto confidential.
749 (j) All workpapers, recorded information, documents and copies
750 thereof produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or
751 any other person in the course of an examination made under this
752 section shall be confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena and shall
753 not be made public by the commissioner or any other person, except to
754 the extent provided in subsection (i) of this section. The commissioner
755 may grant access to such workpapers, recorded information, documents
756 and copies thereof to the National Association of Insurance
757 Commissioners, provided said association agrees, in writing, to hold
758 such workpapers, recorded information, documents and copies thereof
759 confidential.
760 (k) (1) The commissioner may from time to time engage, on an
761 individual basis, the services of qualified actuaries, certified public
762 accountants or other similar individuals who are independently
763 practicing their professions, even though said persons may from time to
764 time be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to
765 examination under this section.
766 (2) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed
767 against the commissioner, the commissioner's authorized
768 representatives or any examiner appointed by the commissioner for any
769 statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out
770 the provisions of this section.
771 (3) No cause of action shall arise, nor shall any liability be imposed
772 against any person for the act of communicating or delivering
773 information or data to the commissioner or the commissioner's
774 authorized representative examiner pursuant to an examination made
LCO 25 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
775 under this section, if such act of communication or delivery was
776 performed in good faith and without fraudulent intent or the intent to
777 deceive.
778 (4) This section shall not abrogate or modify in any way any common
779 law or statutory privilege or immunity heretofore enjoyed by any
780 person identified in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
781 (5) A person identified in subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
782 entitled to an award of attorney's fees and costs if such person is the
783 prevailing party in a civil action for libel, slander or any other relevant
784 tort arising out of activities in carrying out the provisions of this section
785 and the party bringing the action was not substantially justified in doing
786 so. For purposes of this section, a proceeding is "substantially justified"
787 if it had a reasonable basis in law or fact at the time that it was initiated.
788 Sec. 7. Section 38a-15 of the general statutes is repealed and the
789 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
790 (a) The commissioner shall, as often as the commissioner deems it
791 expedient, undertake a market conduct examination of the affairs of any
792 insurance company, health care center, self-funded multiple employer
793 welfare arrangement trust, as defined in section 2 of this act, third-party
794 administrator, as defined in section 38a-720, or fraternal benefit society
795 doing business in this state. Any such examination may be conducted in
796 accordance with the procedures and definitions set forth in the National
797 Association of Insurance Commissioners' Market Regulation
798 Handbook.
799 (b) To carry out the examinations under this section, the
800 commissioner may appoint, as market conduct examiners, one or more
801 competent persons, who shall not be officers of, or connected with or
802 interested in, any insurance company, health care center, self-funded
803 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, third-party administrator
804 or fraternal benefit society, other than as a policyholder. In conducting
805 the examination, the commissioner, the commissioner's actuary or any
806 examiner authorized by the commissioner may examine, under oath,
LCO 26 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
807 the officers and agents of such insurance company, health care center,
808 self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, third-party
809 administrator or fraternal benefit society and all persons deemed to
810 have material information regarding the company's, center's, self-
811 funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust's, administrator's
812 or society's property or business. Each such company, center, self-
813 funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, administrator or
814 society, its officers and agents, shall produce the books and papers, in
815 its or their possession, relating to its business or affairs, and any other
816 person may be required to produce any book or paper in such person's
817 custody, deemed to be relevant to the examination, for the inspection of
818 the commissioner, the commissioner's actuary or examiners, when
819 required. The officers and agents of the company, center, self-funded
820 multiple employer welfare arrangement trust, administrator or society
821 shall facilitate the examination and aid the examiners in making the
822 same so far as it is in their power to do so.
823 (c) Each market conduct examiner shall make a full and true report
824 of each market conduct examination made by such examiner, which
825 shall comprise only facts appearing upon the books, papers, records or
826 documents of the examined company, center, self-funded multiple
827 employer welfare arrangement trust, administrator or society or
828 ascertained from the sworn testimony of its officers or agents or of other
829 persons examined under oath concerning its affairs. The examiner's
830 report shall be presumptive evidence of the facts therein stated in any
831 action or proceeding in the name of the state against the company,
832 center, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement trust,
833 administrator or society, its officers or agents. The commissioner shall
834 grant a hearing to the company, center, self-funded multiple employer
835 welfare arrangement trust, administrator or society examined before
836 filing any such report and may withhold any such report from public
837 inspection for such time as the commissioner deems proper. The
838 commissioner may, if the commissioner deems it in the public interest,
839 publish any such report, or the result of any such examination contained
840 therein, in one or more newspapers of the state.
LCO 27 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
841 (d) (1) All the expense of any examination made under the authority
842 of this section, other than examinations of domestic insurance
843 companies and domestic health care centers, shall be paid by the
844 company, center, self-funded multiple employer welfare arrangement
845 trust, administrator or society examined.
846 (2) No domestic insurance company or domestic health care center
847 subject to an examination under this section shall pay as costs associated
848 with the examination the salaries, fringe benefits or travel and
849 maintenance expenses of examining personnel of the Insurance
850 Department engaged in such examination if such domestic insurance
851 company or domestic health care center is otherwise liable to
852 assessment levied under section 38a-47, except that domestic insurance
853 companies and domestic health care centers examined outside the state
854 shall pay the travel and maintenance expenses of such examining
855 personnel.
856 (e) (1) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed
857 against the commissioner, the commissioner's authorized representative
858 or any examiner appointed or engaged by the commissioner for any
859 statements made or conduct performed in good faith while carrying out
860 the provisions of this section.
861 (2) No cause of action shall arise nor shall any liability be imposed
862 against any person for the act of communicating or delivering
863 information or data pursuant to an examination made under the
864 authority of this section to the commissioner, the commissioner's
865 authorized representative or an examiner if such communication or
866 delivery was performed in good faith and without fraudulent intent or
867 the intent to deceive.
868 (3) The provisions of this subsection shall not abrogate or modify any
869 common law or statutory privilege or immunity heretofore enjoyed by
870 any person identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
871 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent or prohibit
872 the commissioner from disclosing at any time the content or results of
LCO 28 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
873 an examination report or a preliminary examination report or any
874 matter relating to such report, to (1) the insurance regulatory officials of
875 this state or any other state or country, (2) law enforcement officials of
876 this or any other state, or (3) any agency of this or any other state or of
877 the federal government, provided such officials or agency receiving the
878 report or matters relating to the report agrees, in writing, to hold such
879 report or matters confidential.
880 (g) All workpapers, recorded information, documents and copies
881 thereof produced by, obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or
882 any other person in the course of an examination made under the
883 authority of this section shall be confidential, shall not be subject to
884 subpoena and shall not be made public by the commissioner or any
885 other person, except to the extent provided in subsection (f) of this
886 section. The commissioner may grant access to such workpapers,
887 recorded information, documents and copies to the National
888 Association of Insurance Commissioners, provided said association
889 agrees, in writing, to hold such workpapers, recorded information,
890 documents and copies thereof confidential.
891 Sec. 8. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
892 (1) "Affordable Care Act" means the Patient Protection and
893 Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the Health Care and
894 Education Reconciliation Act, P.L. 111-152, as both may be amended
895 from time to time, and regulations adopted pursuant to said acts;
896 (2) "Connecticut Option program" means a standardized health
897 benefit plan designed by the state to reduce health care coverage costs
898 and made available through private or commercial insurance carriers to
899 individuals in the state;
900 (3) "Exchange" means the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange
901 established under section 38a-1081 of the general statutes;
902 (4) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in section
903 38a-1080 of the general statutes;
LCO 29 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
904 (5) "State innovation waiver" means a waiver of one or more
905 requirements of the Affordable Care Act authorized under Section 1332
906 of said act; and
907 (6) "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
908 Management.
909 (b) The Office of Policy and Management shall, within available
910 resources, study the feasibility of establishing the Connecticut Option
911 program with the goal of reducing health insurance premiums. The
912 study shall include analyses, conclusions and recommendations
913 sufficient for the secretary, in consultation with the Insurance
914 Commissioner, to evaluate and compare design models. The study shall
915 include, but need not be limited to:
916 (1) A review of the efficacy, impact and reasonableness of proposed
917 program design elements, including, but not limited to: (A) Provider
918 reimbursement methodologies; (B) value-based or performance-based
919 contracting arrangements; (C) enrollee cost-sharing and premium
920 affordability targets; (D) incentives or rewards for the delivery of high-
921 quality, cost-effective health care; and (E) any state-specific premium
922 assistance programs or risk stabilization programs, including, but not
923 limited to, a state-operated reinsurance program that may maximize
924 available federal funding pursuant to a state innovation waiver under
925 Section 1332 of the Affordable Care Act;
926 (2) Identification of any necessary statutory or regulatory changes
927 required for implementation;
928 (3) Determination of staffing needs across state agencies to effectively
929 implement the Connecticut Option program;
930 (4) Analysis of the state insurance market and projected impacts of
931 the Connecticut Option program on persons who receive health care
932 coverage through the exchange; and
933 (5) Required state action or design elements needed to achieve
LCO 30 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
934 multiple premium savings targets.
935 (c) Not later than January 15, 2027, the secretary shall file an interim
936 report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
937 statutes, on the study conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this
938 section with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
939 having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets
940 of state agencies, human services and insurance and real estate. Not later
941 than January 31, 2028, the secretary shall file a final report, in accordance
942 with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, on the
943 feasibility of the Connecticut Option program and any
944 recommendations on implementing the program with the joint standing
945 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
946 relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human
947 services and insurance and real estate.
948 (d) If the secretary, in consultation with the Insurance Commissioner,
949 determines a Connecticut Option program is feasible after completion
950 of the study or related reports pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this
951 section, the secretary may direct the relevant state agency to develop
952 and implement a waiver under Section 1332 of the Affordable Care Act
953 or any applicable waiver from federal law that may be required to
954 maximize federal funding for the program or any component part of a
955 program design to help achieve health care savings.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 38a-1
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 4 January 1, 2027 38a-567
Sec. 5 January 1, 2027 38a-9(a)
Sec. 6 January 1, 2027 38a-14
Sec. 7 January 1, 2027 38a-15
Sec. 8 from passage New section
LCO 31 of 32

Substitute Bill No. 5378
INS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 32 of 32